Illinois, session 104th, HB2838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Biometric Information Privacy Act is 5amended by changing Sections 10, 15, 20, and 25 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 14/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Biometric identifier" means a retina or iris scan, 9fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry. 10Biometric identifiers do not include writing samples, written 11signatures, photographs, human biological samples used for 12valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, 13tattoo descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, 14weight, hair color, or eye color. Biometric identifiers do not 15include donated organs, tissues, or parts as defined in the 16Illinois Anatomical Gift Act or blood or serum stored on 17behalf of recipients or potential recipients of living or 18cadaveric transplants and obtained or stored by a federally 19designated organ procurement agency. Biometric identifiers do 20not include biological materials regulated under the Genetic 21Information Privacy Act. Biometric identifiers do not include 22information captured from a patient in a health care setting 23or information collected, used, or stored for health care   HB2838- 2 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1treatment, payment, or operations under the federal Health 2Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. 3Biometric identifiers do not include an X-ray, roentgen 4process, computed tomography, MRI, PET scan, mammography, or 5other image or film of the human anatomy used to diagnose, 6prognose, or treat an illness or other medical condition or to 7further validate scientific testing or screening. "Biometric 8identifier" does not include (i) information captured and 9converted to a mathematical representation, including, but not 10limited to, a numeric string or similar method that cannot be 11used to recreate the biometric identifier or (ii) information 12that cannot reasonably be used to identify an individual. 13    "Biometric information" means any information, regardless 14of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on 15an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an 16individual. Biometric information does not include information 17derived from items or procedures excluded under the definition 18of biometric identifiers.19    "Biometric lock" means a device that is used to grant 20access to a person and converts the person's biometric 21identifier or biometric information to a mathematical 22representation, including, but not limited to, a numeric 23string or similar method that cannot be used to recreate the 24person's biometric identifier.25    "Biometric time clock" means a device that is used for 26time management and converts a person's biometric identifier   HB2838- 3 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1or biometric information to a mathematical representation, 2including, but not limited to, a numeric string or similar 3method that cannot be used to recreate the person's biometric 4identifier. 5    "Confidential and sensitive information" means personal 6information that can be used to uniquely identify an 7individual or an individual's account or property. Examples of 8confidential and sensitive information include, but are not 9limited to, a genetic marker, genetic testing information, a 10unique identifier number to locate an account or property, an 11account number, a PIN number, a pass code, a driver's license 12number, or a social security number.13    "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, 14or process attached to or logically associated with a record 15and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the 16record.17    "Person" means a natural person. A person does not include 18an individual a private entity has no knowing contact with, or 19awareness of. 20    "Private entity" means any individual, partnership, 21corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 22group, however organized. A private entity does not include a 23State or local government agency. A private entity does not 24include any court of Illinois, a clerk of the court, or a judge 25or justice thereof.26    "Security purpose" means for the purpose of preventing or   HB2838- 4 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1investigating retail theft, fraud, or any other 2misappropriation or theft of a thing of value. "Security 3purpose" includes protecting property from trespass, 4controlling access to property, or protecting any person from 5harm, including stalking, violence, or harassment, and 6includes assisting a law enforcement investigation. 7    "Written release" means informed written consent, 8electronic signature, or, in the context of employment, a 9release executed by an employee as a condition of employment.10(Source: P.A. 103-769, eff. 8-2-24.) 11    (740 ILCS 14/15)12    Sec. 15. Retention; collection; disclosure; destruction. 13    (a) A private entity in possession of biometric 14identifiers or biometric information must develop a written 15policy, made available to the person from whom biometric 16information is to be collected or was collected public, 17establishing a retention schedule and guidelines for 18permanently destroying biometric identifiers and biometric 19information when the initial purpose for collecting or 20obtaining such identifiers or information has been satisfied 21or within 3 years of the individual's last interaction with 22the private entity, whichever occurs first. Absent a valid 23order, warrant, or subpoena issued by a court of competent 24jurisdiction or a local or federal governmental agency, a 25private entity in possession of biometric identifiers or   HB2838- 5 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1biometric information must comply with its established 2retention schedule and destruction guidelines.3    (b) No private entity may collect, capture, purchase, 4receive through trade, or otherwise obtain a person's or a 5customer's biometric identifier or biometric information, 6unless it first:7        (1) informs the subject or the subject's legally 8    authorized representative in writing that a biometric 9    identifier or biometric information is being collected or 10    stored;11        (2) informs the subject or the subject's legally 12    authorized representative in writing of the specific 13    purpose and length of term for which a biometric 14    identifier or biometric information is being collected, 15    stored, and used; and16        (3) receives a written release executed by the subject 17    of the biometric identifier or biometric information or 18    the subject's legally authorized representative. 19    (b-5) A private entity may collect, capture, or otherwise 20obtain a person's or a customer's biometric identifier or 21biometric information without satisfying the requirements of 22subsection (b) if:23        (1) the private entity collects, captures, or 24    otherwise obtains a person's or a customer's biometric 25    identifier or biometric information for a security 26    purpose;  HB2838- 6 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1        (2) the private entity uses the biometric identifier 2    or biometric information only for a security purpose;3        (3) the private entity retains the biometric 4    identifier or biometric information no longer than is 5    reasonably necessary to satisfy a security purpose; and6        (4) the private entity documents a process and time 7    frame to delete any biometric information used for the 8    purposes identified in this subsection. 9    (c) No private entity in possession of a biometric 10identifier or biometric information may sell, lease, trade, or 11otherwise profit from a person's or a customer's biometric 12identifier or biometric information.13    (d) No private entity in possession of a biometric 14identifier or biometric information may disclose, redisclose, 15or otherwise disseminate a person's or a customer's biometric 16identifier or biometric information unless:17        (1) the subject of the biometric identifier or 18    biometric information or the subject's legally authorized 19    representative consents to the disclosure or redisclosure;20        (2) the disclosure or redisclosure completes a 21    financial transaction requested or authorized by the 22    subject of the biometric identifier or the biometric 23    information or the subject's legally authorized 24    representative;25        (3) the disclosure or redisclosure is required by 26    State or federal law or municipal ordinance; or  HB2838- 7 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1        (4) the disclosure is required pursuant to a valid 2    warrant or subpoena issued by a court of competent 3    jurisdiction. 4    (e) A private entity in possession of a biometric 5identifier or biometric information shall:6        (1) store, transmit, and protect from disclosure all 7    biometric identifiers and biometric information using the 8    reasonable standard of care within the private entity's 9    industry; and 10        (2) store, transmit, and protect from disclosure all 11    biometric identifiers and biometric information in a 12    manner that is the same as or more protective than the 13    manner in which the private entity stores, transmits, and 14    protects other confidential and sensitive information. 15(Source: P.A. 95-994, eff. 10-3-08.) 16    (740 ILCS 14/20)17    Sec. 20. Right of action. 18    (a) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this Act shall 19have a right of action in a State circuit court or as a 20supplemental claim in federal district court against an 21offending party, which shall be commenced within one year 22after the cause of action accrued if, prior to initiating any 23action against a private entity, the aggrieved person provides 24a private entity 30 days' written notice identifying the 25specific provisions of this Act the aggrieved person alleges   HB2838- 8 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1have been or are being violated. If, within the 30 days, the 2private entity actually cures the noticed violation and 3provides the aggrieved person an express written statement 4that the violation has been cured and that no further 5violations shall occur, no action for individual statutory 6damages or class-wide statutory damages may be initiated 7against the private entity. If a private entity continues to 8violate this Act in breach of the express written statement 9provided to the aggrieved person under this Section, the 10aggrieved person may initiate an action against the private 11entity to enforce the written statement and may pursue 12statutory damages for each breach of the express written 13statement and any other violation that postdates the written 14statement. 15    (b) A prevailing party may recover for each violation:16        (1) against a private entity that negligently violates 17    a provision of this Act, liquidated damages of $1,000 or 18    actual damages, whichever is greater;19        (2) against a private entity that intentionally or 20    recklessly violates a provision of this Act, liquidated 21    damages of $5,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater;22        (3) reasonable attorneys' fees and costs, including 23    expert witness fees and other litigation expenses; and24        (4) other relief, including an injunction, as the 25    State or federal court may deem appropriate.26    (b) For purposes of subsection (b) of Section 15, a   HB2838- 9 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1private entity that, in more than one instance, collects, 2captures, purchases, receives through trade, or otherwise 3obtains the same biometric identifier or biometric information 4from the same person using the same method of collection in 5violation of subsection (b) of Section 15 has committed a 6single violation of subsection (b) of Section 15 for which the 7aggrieved person is entitled to, at most, one recovery under 8this Section.9    (c) For purposes of subsection (d) of Section 15, a 10private entity that, in more than one instance, discloses, 11rediscloses, or otherwise disseminates the same biometric 12identifier or biometric information from the same person to 13the same recipient using the same method of collection in 14violation of subsection (d) of Section 15 has committed a 15single violation of subsection (d) of Section 15 for which the 16aggrieved person is entitled to, at most, one recovery under 17this Section regardless of the number of times the private 18entity disclosed, redisclosed, or otherwise disseminated the 19same biometric identifier or biometric information of the same 20person to the same recipient. 21(Source: P.A. 103-769, eff. 8-2-24.) 22    (740 ILCS 14/25)23    Sec. 25. Construction. 24    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to impact the 25admission or discovery of biometric identifiers and biometric   HB2838- 10 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1information in any action of any kind in any court, or before 2any tribunal, board, agency, or person.3    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to conflict 4with the X-Ray Retention Act, the federal Health Insurance 5Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, and the rules 6promulgated under either Act.7    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to apply in any 8manner to a financial institution or an affiliate of a 9financial institution that is subject to Title V of the 10federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999 and the rules 11promulgated thereunder.12    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to conflict 13with the Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, 14Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 and the rules 15promulgated thereunder or information captured by an alarm 16system as defined by that Act installed by a person licensed 17under that Act and the rules adopted thereunder.18    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 19contractor, subcontractor, or agent of a State or federal 20agency or local unit of government when working for that State 21or federal agency or local unit of government.22    (f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to 23information captured by a biometric time clock or biometric 24lock that converts a person's biometric identifier or 25biometric information to a mathematical representation, 26including, but not limited to, a numeric string or similar   HB2838- 11 -LRB104 08099 JRC 18145 b1method that cannot be used to recreate the person's biometric 2identifier or biometric information. 3    (g) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 4private entity if the private entity's employees are covered 5by a collective bargaining agreement that provides for 6different policies regarding the retention, collection, 7disclosure, and destruction of biometric information. 8(Source: P.A. 95-994, eff. 10-3-08.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.